District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.19

Acquisition of land and right-of-way for pipelines.

The Secretary of the Army is hereby authorized to acquire by purchase or condemnation all necessary lands, easements, and rights-of-way for pipelines within the District of Columbia to connect the force main of said pumping station with the water main in Arlington County as herein authorized.

History

Apr. 14, 1926, 44 Stat. 252, ch. 140, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1544.
1973 Ed., § 43-1532.